Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4898.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [3.0555] LEGISLATIVE TECHNOLOGY AND OFFICE SPACE; USE LIMITED. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Email and telephone. new text end new text begin A member, officer, employee, or intern of the senate or house of representatives is prohibited from establishing a legislative email address for or assigning a legislative telephone number to a person who is not a member, officer, employee, or intern of the senate or house of representatives. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Member telephone numbers. new text end new text begin The legislative telephone number assigned by the senate or house of representatives to a member is for the exclusive use of the member and, if authorized by the member, an employee or intern who is assigned to support the member by the member's caucus or legislative body. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Office space. new text end new text begin A member, officer, employee, or intern of the senate or house of representatives is prohibited from allowing a contractor or other person who is not a member, officer, employee, or intern to permanently or temporarily office in a space assigned by the commissioner of administration to the senate or house of representatives without prior written notification to the leaders of each caucus in the relevant house. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Enforcement. new text end new text begin The senate and house of representatives must adopt rules to implement this section, which must include remedies. new text end